DI-62
DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE

DHLG-17

DTC PO0116 | Engine Coolant Temperature Circuit Range/
Performance Problem

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Refer to DTC P0115 on page DI- 56.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

—

Ifthe engine coolanttemperaturewas35  °C (95 °F) ormoreb
lessthan60 °C (140° F) whenthe engineis started, and if
conditions (a) and (b) are met:

(a) Vehicle has accelerated and decelerated.

(b) Engine coolanttemperature remainswithin3  °C (5.4 °F) of

the initial engine coolant temperature (2 trip detection logic) .
PO116 * Engine coerlanttemperature sensor

« Ifthe engine coolanttemperature is more than 60 °C (140°H)
when the engine is started and the vehicle has accelerated
and decelerated

« Ifthe engine coolanttemperature sensorrecords atempera-
ture variationbelow 1°C (1.8° F) successively 6times (6 trip
detection logic)

MONITOR DESCRIPTION

The ECT (Engine Coolant Temperature) sensor is used to monitor the engine coolant temperature. The ECT
sensor has a thermistor that varies its resistance depending on the temperature of the engine coolant. When
the coolant temperature is low, the resistance in the thermistor increases. When the temperature is high, the
resistance drops. The variations in resistance are reflected in the voltage output from the sensor. The engine
control ECU monitors the sensor voltage and uses this value to calculate the engine coolant temperature.
When the sensor output does not change, the engine control ECU interprets this as a fault in the ECT sensor
and sets a DTC.

Examples:

(1) Upon starting the engine, the ECT is between 35 °C(95 °"F)and60 °C (140°F).Ifafterdrivingfor250sec.,
the ECT stillremainswithin3  °C (5.4 ° F) ofthe startingtemperature, a DTC will be set (2 trip detection logic).
(2) Upon starting the engine, the ECT is over 60 °C (140° F). If after driving for 250 sec., the ECT still remains
within 1° C (1.8° F) ofthe startingtemperature, aDTC will be set (6 trip detection logic).

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:

. [fDTCPO 115,P0 116,P0 117,P0 118and PO 125 are output simultaneously, ECT sensor circuitmay
be open or shorted. Performthe troubleshooting of DTC PO 115,P0 117 o r P 0118first.

. Readfreezeframedatausingthehand  -heldtester. Freeze frame datarecordsthe engine conditions
when a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the
vehicle was running or stopped, ifthe engine was warmed up or not, ifthe air —fuelratiowasleanor
rich, as well as other data from the time when a malfunction occurred.

Replace engine coolant temperature sensor.
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